Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 57. Destruction of Records
[Repealed]

§§ 25-57-1 through 25-57-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 501, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§25-57-1. [Codes, 1942, § 4065.7-01; Laws, 1966, ch. 554, § 1]

§25-57-3. [Codes, 1942, § 4065.7-02; Laws, 1966, ch. 554, § 2]

§25-57-5. [Codes, 1942, § 4065.7-03; Laws, 1966, ch. 554, § 3]

§25-57-7. [Codes, 1942, § 4065.7-05; Laws, 1966, ch. 554, § 5]

§25-57-9. [Codes, 1942, § 4065.7-06; Laws, 1966, ch. 554, § 6; 1978, ch. 458, § 26]